apertium-en-gl/apertium-en-gl.en.metadix
    <pardef n="BBC__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Barcelona__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="United_States__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Mark__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
        <pardef n="James__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Mary__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Smith__np">
      <e c="CP: paradigm for family names">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>s'</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Linux__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Yankees__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="one__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="two__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>hundred</l> 
        <r><b/>hundred<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>thousand</l> 
        <r><b/>thousand<s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="million__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="twenty__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r/> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-one</l> 
        <r>-one</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-two</l> 
        <r>-two</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-three</l> 
        <r>-three</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-four</l> 
        <r>-four</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-five</l> 
        <r>-five</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-six</l> 
        <r>-six</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-seven</l> 
        <r>-seven</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-eight</l> 
        <r>-eight</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-nine</l> 
        <r>-nine</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="two__num"/> 
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ha/ve__vbmod">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ve</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ve</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>d</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>d</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ving</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ving</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ving</l> 
        <r>ve<s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="want__vbmod">
    <e c="CP: regular verbs (-,s,ing,ed)">
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ed</l> 
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ed</l> 
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ing</l> 
        <r><s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="will/__vbmod">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l/> 
        <r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="c/an__vbmod">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>an</l> 
        <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL" c="mig arreglo raro, revisar">
      <p>
        <l>an</l> 
        <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ould</l> 
        <r>an<s n="vaux"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/be_able_to__vbmod">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>be<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>are<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>am<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>is<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>was<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>was<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>were<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>been<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>being<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>being<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pprs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>being<b/>able<b/>to</l> 
        <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="subs"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<e lm="Gioia">
        <i>Gioia</i> 
        <par n="Mary__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Neri">
        <i>Neri</i> 
        <par n="Mary__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Damián">
        <i>Damián</i> 
        <par n="Mark__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Iolav">
        <i>Iolav</i> 
        <par n="Mark__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Polonio">
        <i>Polonio</i> 
        <par n="Mark__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Cody">
        <i>Cody</i> 
        <par n="Mark__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Hope">
        <i>Hope</i> 
        <par n="Mary__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Canary Islands">
        <i>Canary<b/>Islands</i> 
        <par n="United_States__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Dennis">
        <i>Dennis</i> 
        <par n="James__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Edinburgh">
        <i>Edinburgh</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="James">
        <i>James</i> 
        <par n="James__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Lluís">
        <i>Lluís</i> 
        <par n="James__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Mars">
        <i>Mars</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Nicolas">
        <i>Nicolas</i> 
        <par n="James__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="South Africa">
        <i>South<b/>Africa</i> 
        <par n="Barcelona__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="United States">
        <i>United<b/>States</i> 
        <par n="United_States__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Abu Dhabi">
	    <i>Abu<b/>Dhabi</i> 
	    <par n="Barcelona__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Senra">
	    <i>Senra</i> 
	    <par n="Smith__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Chrysler">
	    <i>Chrysler</i> 
	    <par n="Linux__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Moss">
	    <i>Moss</i> 
	    <par n="Smith__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Barclay">
	    <i>Barclay</i> 
	    <par n="Linux__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Glastonbury">
	    <i>Glastonbury</i> 
	    <par n="Barcelona__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Yankees">
        <i>Yankees</i> 
        <par n="Yankees__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Americas">
        <i>Americas</i> 
        <par n="United_States__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Fowler">
	    <i>Fowler</i> 
	    <par n="Smith__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Grammys">
        <i>Grammys</i> 
        <par n="Yankees__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="O'Shea">
        <i>O'Shea</i> 
        <par n="Linux__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Armstrong">
        <i>Armstrong</i> 
        <par n="Smith__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Juande Ramos">
        <i>Juande<b/>Ramos</i> 
        <par n="James__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="Metallica">
        <i>Metallica</i> 
        <par n="Linux__np"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="CLCS" c="Closed-Loop Control System "><i>CLCS</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="ESP" c="Electrostatic precipitator "><i>ESP</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="IMCP" c="integrated multi-function corrosion probe "><i>IMCP</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="NGPF" c="North General Purpose Facilities "><i>NGPF</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="TCSEC" c="Trusted computer system evaluation criteria "><i>TCSEC</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="can">
        <i>c</i> 
        <par n="c/an__vbmod"/> 
    </e>
<e lm="be able to" r="RL" c="de momento só é xerado">
	    <i/>
	    <par n="/be_able_to__vbmod"/>
    </e>
<e lm="have to">
        <i>ha</i> 
        <par n="ha/ve__vbmod"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>to</l> 
        <r><g><b/>to</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="want to">
        <i>want</i> 
        <par n="want__vbmod"/> 
      <p>
        <l><b/>to</l> 
        <r><g><b/>to</g></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e lm="shall"><i>shall</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="would"><i>would</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="should"><i>should</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
<e lm="might"><i>might</i><par n="will/__vbmod"/></e>
	<e lm="one"><i>one</i><par n="one__num"/></e>
<e lm="a thousand"><i>a<b/>thousand</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="one hundred"><i>one<b/>hundred</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="one million"><i>one<b/>million</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="billion"><i>billion</i><par n="million__num"/></e>
<e lm="two"><i>two</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="ten"><i>ten</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="fourteen"><i>fourteen</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="eighteen"><i>eighteen</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="thirty"><i>thirty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="forty"><i>forty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="sixty"><i>sixty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
<e lm="eighty"><i>eighty</i><par n="twenty__num"/></e>
    <e lm="Aristotle"><i>Aristotle</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Enide"><i>Enide</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
